Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB772.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1318 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1318. Suspension and Expulsion of Pupils.--(a) Every principal or teacher in charge of a public school may temporarily suspend any pupil who is eight (8) years of age or older on account of disobedience or misconduct, and any principal or teacher suspending any pupil shall promptly notify the district superintendent or secretary of the board of school directors. The board may, after a proper hearing, suspend such child for such time as it may determine, or may permanently expel [him] the pupil. Such hearings, suspension, or expulsion 1234567891011121314151617181920 may be delegated to a duly authorized committee of the board, or to a duly qualified hearing examiner, who need not be a member of the board, but whose adjudication must be approved by the board.(b) A principal or teacher in charge of a public school may not exclude a pupil specified under subsection (a) from in-person instruction for more than ten (10) school days without a proper hearing.(c) A principal or teacher in charge of a public school may not suspend or expel a pupil younger than eight (8) years of age from a public school or publicly funded pre-kindergarten program unless the pupil poses an imminent threat of harm or danger to others in the public school or pre-kindergarten program.(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the expulsion of a pupil in accordance with section 1317.2.(e) As used in this section, the term "pre-kindergarten program" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 2002-B.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0772PN0794 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819